Xcode.app/Contents/Developer/Platforms/iPhoneOS.platform/Library/Developer/CoreSimulator/Profiles/Runtimes/iOS.simruntime/Contents/Resources/RuntimeRoot/System/Library/ScreenReader/BrailleTables/LiblouisBrailleTranslator.brailletable/liblouis/tables/vi-vn-g2.ctb
 %[a_.^] 6-45
# uy
 vowel groups just combined with letter n and t but already have contraction
# so just simply define for words uy
n and uy
word uy
n 235-1345
word uy
n 26-235-1345
match %a uy
 %a 235
match %a uy
 %a 35-235
match %a uy
 %a 56-235
match %a uy
 %a 26-235
match %a uy
 %a 36-235
match %a uy
 %a 6-235
# self-accent parts without contractions
match %a 
p %[_.^] 1-1234
match %a 
c %[_.^] 345-14
match %a 
p %[_.^] 345-1234
match %a 
c %[_.^] 16-14
match %a 
c %[_.^] 15-14
match %a 
p %[_.^] 15-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 15-2345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
ch %[_.^] 126-13
match %a 
p %[_.^] 126-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 126-2345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
ch %[_.^] 24-13
match %a 
p %[_.^] 24-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 24-2345
match %a 
c %[_.^] 135-14
match %a 
p %[_.^] 135-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 135-2345
match %a 
c %[_.^] 1456-14
match %a 
p %[_.^] 1456-1234
match %a 
p %[_.^] 246-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 246-2345
match %a 
c %[_.^] 136-14
match %a 
p %[_.^] 136-1234
match %a 
t %[_.^] 136-2345
match %a 
t %[_.^] 1256-2345
# rhyme contractions
match %a ac %[_.^] 14
match %a 
c %[_.^] 14
match %a 
c %[_.^] 6-14
match %a ach %[_.^] 146
match %a 
ch %[_.^] 146
match %a 
ch %[_.^] 6-146
match %a ai %[_^] 35
match %a 
i %[_.^] 35-35
match %a 
i %[_.^] 56-35
match %a 
i %[_.^] 26-35
match %a 
i %[_.^] 36-35
match %a 
i %[_.^] 6-35
always am! 1-134-235
always 
m! 35-1-134-235
always 
m! 56-1-134-235
always 
m! 26-1-134-235
always 
m! 36-1-134-235
always 
m! 6-1-134-235
match %a am %[_.^] 235
match %a 
m %[_.^] 35-235
match %a 
m %[_.^] 56-235
match %a 
m %[_.^] 26-235
match %a 
m %[_.^] 36-235
match %a 
m %[^_.] 6-235
# no contracted if followed a punctuation
match %a an %[_^] 6
match %a 
n %[_.^] 35-6
match %a 
n %[_.^] 56-6
match %a 
n %[_.^] 26-6
match %a 
n %[_.^] 36-6
match %a 
n %[_.^] 6-6
match %a ang %[_.^] 123
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-123
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-123
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-123
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-123
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-123
match %a|![o\s] anh %[_.^] 125
match %a|![o\s] 
nh %[_.^] 35-125
match %a|![o\s] 
nh %[_.^] 56-125
match %a|![o\s] 
nh %[_.^] 26-125
match %a|![o\s] 
nh %[_.^] 36-125
match %a|![o\s] 
nh %[_.^] 6-125
match %a ao %[_^] 26
match %a 
o %[_.^] 35-26
match %a 
o %[_.^] 56-26
match %a 
o %[_.^] 26-26
match %a 
o %[_.^] 36-26
match %a 
o %[_.^] 6-26
match %a at %[_.^] 12356
match %a 
t %[_.^] 12356
match %a 
t %[_.^] 6-12356
match %a ay %[_.^] 23
match %a 
y %[_.^] 35-23
match %a 
y %[_.^] 56-23
match %a 
y %[_.^] 26-23
match %a 
y %[_.^] 36-23
match %a 
y %[_.^] 6-23
match %a 
m %[_.^] 124
match %a 
m %[_.^] 35-124
match %a 
m %[_.^] 56-124
match %a 
m %[_.^] 26-124
match %a 
m %[_.^] 36-124
match %a 
m %[_.^] 6-124
match %a 
n %[_.^] 345
match %a 
n %[_.^] 35-345
match %a 
n %[_.^] 56-345
match %a 
n %[_.^] 26-345
match %a 
n %[_.^] 36-345
match %a 
n %[_.^] 6-345
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 456
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-456
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-456
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-456
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-456
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-456
match %a 
t %[_.^] 23456
match %a 
t %[_.^] 23456
match %a 
t %[_.^] 6-23456
match %a 
m %[_.^] 1346
match %a 
m %[_.^] 35-1346
match %a 
m %[_.^] 56-1346
match %a 
m %[_.^] 26-1346
match %a 
m %[_.^] 36-1346
match %a 
m %[_.^] 6-1346
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 16
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 35-16
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 56-16
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 26-16
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 36-16
match %a|![u\s] 
n %[_.^] 6-16
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 1345
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 35-1345
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 56-1345
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 26-1345
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 36-1345
match %a|![i\s] 
n %[_.^] 6-1345
word 
p 16-1234
match %[a_^] 
p %. 16-1234
match %a 
p %[_^] 56
match %a 
p %[_.^] 6-56
match %a 
t %[_.^] 2345
match %a 
t %[_.^] 2345
match %a 
t %[_.^] 6-2345
match %a 
y %[_.^] 12
match %a 
y %[_.^] 35-12
match %a 
y %[_.^] 56-12
match %a 
y %[_.^] 26-12
match %a 
y %[_.^] 36-12
match %a 
y %[_.^] 6-12
match %a 
u %[_.^] 346
match %a 
u %[_.^] 35-346
match %a 
u %[_.^] 56-346
match %a 
u %[_.^] 26-346
match %a 
u %[_.^] 36-346
match %a 
u %[_.^] 6-346
match %a ia %[_.^] 34
match %a 
a %[_.^] 35-34
match %a 
a %[_.^] 56-34
match %a 
a %[_.^] 26-34
match %a 
a %[_.^] 36-34
match %a 
a %[_.^] 6-34
match %a ya %[_.^] 34
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
c %[_.^] 36
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
c %[_.^] 36
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
c %[_.^] 6-36
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 35-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 56-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 26-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 36-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
m %[_.^] 6-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 35-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 56-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 26-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 36-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] i
n %[_.^] 6-1356
match %a i
p %[_.^] 1234
match %a i
p %[_.^] 1234
match %a i
p %[_.^] 6-1234
match %a i
t %[_.^] 12456
match %a i
t %[_.^] 12456
match %a i
t %[_.^] 6-12456
match %a inh %[_.^] 236
match %a 
nh %[_.^] 35-236
match %a 
nh %[_.^] 56-236
match %a 
nh %[_.^] 26-236
match %a 
nh %[_.^] 36-236
match %a 
nh %[_.^] 6-236
match %a oi %[_.^] 356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 35-356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 56-356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 26-356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 36-356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 6-356
match %a on %[_.^] 1236
match %a 
n %[_.^] 35-1236
match %a 
n %[_.^] 56-1236
match %a 
n %[_.^] 26-1236
match %a 
n %[_.^] 36-1236
match %a 
n %[_.^] 6-1236
match %a ong %[_.^] 2356
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-2356
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-2356
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-2356
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-2356
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-2356
match %a 
i %[_.^] 245
match %a 
i %[_.^] 35-245
match %a 
i %[_.^] 56-245
match %a 
i %[_.^] 26-245
match %a 
i %[_.^] 36-245
match %a 
i %[_.^] 6-245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 1245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-1245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-1245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-1245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-1245
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-1245
match %a 
t %[_.^] 1246
match %a 
t %[_.^] 1246
match %a 
t %[_.^] 6-1246
match %a 
i %[_.^] 2456
match %a 
i %[_.^] 35-2456
match %a 
i %[_.^] 56-2456
match %a 
i %[_.^] 26-2456
match %a 
i %[_.^] 36-2456
match %a 
i %[_.^] 6-2456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 3456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 35-3456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 56-3456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 26-3456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 36-3456
match %a 
n %[_.^] 6-3456
match %a ua %[_.^] 12346
match %a 
a %[_.^] 35-12346
match %a 
a %[_.^] 56-12346
match %a 
a %[_.^] 26-12346
match %a 
a %[_.^] 36-12346
match %a 
a %[_.^] 6-12346
match %a ung %[_.^] 13
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-13
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-13
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-13
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-13
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-13
match %a u
c %[_.^] 1235
match %a u
c %[_.^] 1235
match %a u
c %[_.^] 6-1235
match %a uy
t %[_.^] 123456
match %a uy
t %[_.^] 123456
match %a uy
t %[_.^] 6-123456
match %a 
a %[_.^] 156
match %a 
a %[_.^] 35-156
match %a 
a %[_.^] 56-156
match %a 
a %[_.^] 26-156
match %a 
a %[_.^] 36-156
match %a 
a %[_.^] 6-156
match %a 
c %[_.^] 234
match %a 
c %[_.^] 234
match %a 
c %[_.^] 6-234
match %a 
c %[_.^] 25
match %a 
c %[_.^] 25
match %a 
c %[_.^] 6-25
match %a 
i %[_.^] 145
match %a 
i %[_.^] 35-145
match %a 
i %[_.^] 56-145
match %a 
i %[_.^] 26-145
match %a 
i %[_.^] 36-145
match %a 
i %[_.^] 6-145
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 256
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-256
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-256
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-256
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-256
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-256
word uy
n 45-1345
word uy
n 26-45-1345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uy
n %[_.^] 12345
match %a uy
n %[_.^] 35-12345
match %a uy
n %[_.^] 56-12345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uy
n %[_.^] 26-12345
match %a uy
n %[_.^] 36-12345
match %a uy
n %[_.^] 6-12345
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 46
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 35-46
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 56-46
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 26-46
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 36-46
match %a 
ng %[_.^] 6-46
#match %a y
n %[_.^] 1356
# double consonants
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ch %a 146
match %a ch %[_.^] 13
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] gi %a 245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] gh %a 1245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] kh %a 12356
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ng %a 346
match %a ng %[_.^] 1245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ngh %a 12456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] nh %a 1246
match %a nh %[_.^] 125
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ph %a 124
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] th %a 2456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] tr %a 23456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] qu %a 12345
match %a i
u %[_.^] 2346
match %a i
u %[_.^] 35-2346
match %a i
u %[_.^] 56-2346
match %a i
u %[_.^] 26-2346
match %a i
u %[_.^] 36-2346
match %a i
u %[_.^] 6-2346
# disabled, encourage to place tone marks right infront of capital vowel letters, instead of before cap indicator
#noback pass2 @46-35 @35-46
#noback pass2 @46-56 @56-46
#noback pass2 @46-26 @26-46
#noback pass2 @46-36 @36-46
#noback pass2 @46-6 @6-46
